North Dakota, session 69, HB1148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Military Appreciation Month.
May of each year is Military Appreciation Month. Each year the governor shall issue a proclamation
on May first in honor of the men and women of the United States Armed Forces who have served and
are now serving, and the significant contributions and incredible sacrifices they have made and
continue to make in the defense of this nation and the preservation of our freedom.

H. B. NO. 1148 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1148.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State